Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.31
State Capitol improvement district; powers.

Whenever any improvement district for the opening, widening, or otherwise improving Fifteenth Street in the city of Lincoln, Nebraska, which connects, adjoins, and is adjacent to the State Capitol and the University of Nebraska, is created by the Mayor and the City Council of the city of Lincoln, Nebraska, the President of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska and the State Capitol Administrator are hereby authorized to sign petitions for the creation of an improvement district including that portion of Fifteenth Street in Lincoln, Nebraska, leading from the State Capitol to the university campus. This is for no other purpose than to form a plan and program, with the gathering of data and cost for the improvement of that portion of Fifteenth Street. Such plan shall be submitted to a subsequent Legislature for its approval or rejection before any liability whatsoever for the consummation of such plan shall be fixed or made. Neither the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska nor the administrator shall expend any money, nor shall the provisions of this section be construed to authorize the expenditure of any public funds whatsoever, except for the preliminary survey incident to the formation of such improvement plans, until the same shall have been authorized by a specific appropriation of the Legislature for the purpose based on the tentative plans so formulated and submitted to the Legislature as contemplated in this section.

Laws 1927, c. 147, § 1, p. 396;

C.S.1929, § 72-801;

R.S.1943, § 72-712;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 22;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 24.